dictionaries/pa_IN.dic
ਅਧੀਨ/F
ਅਨੁਕੂਲ/F
ਅਨੁਪਾਤ/B
ਅਨੁਵਾਦ/L
ਅਨੁਸਾਰ/B
ਅਰਧ/t
ਅਰਬ/B
ਅਸਫਲ/F
ਅੰਕ/ABQ
ਅੰਤ/P
ਅੱਖਰ/AB
ਅੱਧ/C
ਇਕਾ/M
ਇਕਾਈ/D
ਇਕੱਲੀ/D
ਇਨਕੋਡ/J
ਇੰਦਰਾਜ/A
ਇੰਦਰਾਜ਼/A
ਇੰਸਟਾਲ/n
ਉਤਪਾਦ/L
ਉਪ/gk
ਉਲਟਾ/T
ਉੱਤੇ/z
ਉੱਪਰ/B
ਔਸਤ/S
ਕਤਾਰ/A
ਕਰ/uSZYHF
ਕਰਨ/CJ
ਕਰਨਾ/s
ਕਰਮ/o
ਕਰੋ/Zxs
ਕਾਰਜ/l
ਕਾਰਜਸਥਾਨ/A
ਕਾਲ/ZACB
ਕਾਲਆਊਟ/N
ਕਾਲਮ/A
ਕਾਲਾ/Gj
ਕੀ/F
ਕੀਤੀ/D
ਕੁਨੈਕਟ/P
ਕੁਨੈਕਸ਼ਨ/A
ਕੁੰਜੀ/D
ਕੁੱਲ/p
ਕੇ/N
ਕੇਂਦਰ/BQ
ਕੈਲੰਡਰ/e
ਕੋਟ/B
ਕੋਡ/J
ਕੋਣ/B
ਕ੍ਰਮ/o
ਕੱਟ/IRH
ਖਤ/Z
ਖੇਤਰ/A
ਖੋਜ/IXc
ਖੋਲ/UHV
ਗਣਨ/C
ਗਰਾਫਿਕ/N
ਗਰੇਡੀਇੰਟ/N
ਗਲਤ/Bd
ਗਲਤੀ/D
ਗਿਆ/Y
ਗੁਣ/C
ਗੋਲਾ/K
ਘਟਨਾ/E
ਘਣ/K
ਘੱਟ/H
ਚਲਾਉ/I
ਚੀਨ/B
ਚੁਣੀ/D
ਚੋਣ/AE
ਚੱਕਰ/A
ਚੱਲ/UB
ਛੁੱਟੀ/D
ਛੇ/LE
ਜਨ/y
ਜਪਾਨ/B
ਜਾ/GTq
ਜਾਂਚ/K
ਜਿੰਮੇਵਾਰ/B
ਜੋੜ/uSCYHc
ਜੋੜਨ/C
ਜੋੜੋ/x
ਟਿੱਪਣੀ/D
ਟੇਡ/C
ਡਾਇਰੈਕਟਰੀ/D
ਡਾਇਲ/K
ਡਾਇਲਾਗ/A
ਡਿਗਰੀ/D
ਡੂੰਘਾ/M
ਡੈਸ਼/RA
ਡੋਮੇਨ/N
ਢਾਲ/E
ਤਬਦੀਲ/Bd
ਤਬਦੀਲੀ/D
ਤੀਰ/tA
ਤੇ/W
ਤੋ/G
ਤੋਂ/G
ਦਸਤਾਵੇਜ਼/AB
ਦਿਨ/A
ਦਿੱਖ/F
ਦੀ/D
ਦੇ/qU
ਨਕਲ/B
ਨਹੀ/G
ਨਾ/GE
ਨੈਟ/J
ਪਦ/A
ਪਰਕਾਸ਼/S
ਪਹਿਲ/ACB
ਪਹਿਲਾ/G
ਪਹੁੰਚ/C
ਪਾਈ/W
ਪਾਠ/a
ਪਾਸ/O
ਪੀਲਾ/j
ਪੇਸ਼/l
ਪੈਰਾ/c
ਪੋਸਟ/P
ਪ੍ਰਕਾਸ਼/LQ
ਪ੍ਰਤੀਸ਼ਤ/F
ਪ੍ਰਭਾਵ/B
ਪ੍ਰਸਤਾਵ/Q
ਪ੍ਰਾਪਤ/B
ਪੱਟੀ/aD
ਫਰੇਮ/aA
ਫਾਇਲ/A
ਫਾਇਲ਼/A
ਫਾਰਮ/A
ਫੋਲਡਰ/A
ਬਟਨ/A
ਬਣਾ/Tm
ਬਦਲ/IUHE
ਬਦਲਣ/C
ਬਹੁ/h
ਬਹੁਲਾਈਨ/W
ਬਾਈਟ/N
ਬਾਹਰ/B
ਬਿਨ/AC
ਬਿਨਾ/G
ਬਿੰਦੂ/D
ਭਰ/SYOHV
ਭਰਨ/C
ਭਾਗ/A
ਭਾਜ/L
ਭਾਰ/hC
ਭਾਸ਼ਾ/E
ਭਿੰਨ/F
ਭਿੰਨਤਾ/E
ਮਾਪ/I
ਮਾਰਕ/PC
ਮਿੰਟ/A
ਮੁਲਾਇਮ/F
ਮੁੜ/r
ਮੁੜਇੰਸਟਾਲ/n
ਮੁੱਖ/g
ਮੇਟਾ/e
ਮੈਂਬਰ/B
ਮੈਕਰੋ/W
ਮੈਟਾਫਾਇਲ/A
ਮੋਟਾ/M
ਮੌਜੂਦ/C
ਯਾਦ/b
ਯੋਗ/F
ਰਜਿਸਟਰ/n
ਰਸਤਾ/e
ਰਹਿ/Ih
ਰਿਕਾਰਡ/AJ
ਰੂਟ/J
ਰੂਪ/rB
ਰੇਖਾ/RE
ਰੈਜ਼ੋਲੂਸ਼ਨ/k
ਰੱਦ/B
ਲਗਾਉਣ/C
ਲਪੇਟ/IH
ਲਾਇਬਰੇਰੀ/D
ਲਾਲ/j
ਲੇਖ/L
ਲੇਬਲ/AO
ਲੜੀ/R
ਲੰਬ/lKCB
ਲੰਬਕਾਰ/B
ਲੰਬਾ/M
ਲੱਭੋ/X
ਵਧੀਆ/G
ਵਧੇਰੇ/i
ਵਰਤ/V
ਵਾਲੀ/D
ਵਿਆਸ/B
ਵਿਖਾ/Tfm
ਵਿਖਾਉਣ/C
ਵਿਭਾਗ/A
ਵਿਵਸਥਾ/E
ਵਿਸ਼ੇਸ਼ਤਾ/E
ਵਿਸ਼ੇਸਤਾ/E
ਵੱਖ/v
ਵੱਤਰ/A
ਸ਼ਨਾਖਤ/B
ਸ਼ਬਦ/Apy
ਸ਼ਰਤ/A
ਸ਼ੀਟ/A
ਸ਼ੁਰੂਆਤ/B
ਸ਼ੈਲੀ/D
ਸ਼੍ਰੇਣੀ/D
ਸਕੈਨ/P
ਸਕ੍ਰਿਪਟ/J
ਸਟਿੱਪ/J
ਸਫਲ/F
ਸਫਾ/K
ਸਭ/C
ਸਮਅਨੁਪਾਤ/B
ਸਮਕਾਲ/F
ਸਮਾਂ/g
ਸਮੇਂ/G
ਸਰੋਤ/w
ਸਲਾਇਡ/Ak
ਸਲਾਟ/N
ਸਵੀਕਾਰ/b
ਸਾਰ/wOd
ਸਾਰਣੀ/KoXD
ਸਾਵਧਾਨ/B
ਸਿਫਰ/A
ਸਿਰਲੇਖ/Xz
ਸਿੱਧ/C
ਸੀਮਾ/E
ਸੂਚੀ/bD
ਸੈੱਲ/A
ਸਫ਼ਾ/M
ਸੰਕੇਤ/L
ਸੰਖੇਪ/F
ਸੰਬੰਧ/BpQ
ਸੰਭਾਲ/OHV
ਹਟਾ/MiTfm
ਹਟਾਉਣ/C
ਹਵਾਲਾ/R
ਹੀ/v
ਹੁਣ/O
ਹੇਠ/A
ਹੋ/MiIUPf
ਹੋਈ/D
ਹੋਣ/C
